Idaho, session 2025, H0365.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature to
enhance the security and integrity of Idaho's elections by establishing
concurrent authority for the Attorney General to investigate and prosecute
election-related offenses within the State of Idaho. The Legislature seeks
to strengthen enforcement mechanisms, deter unlawful activities, and uphold
the rule of law in the electoral process.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 14, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-1417, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-1417. CONCURRENT AUTHORITY TO INVESTIGATE AND PROSECUTE ELECTION
VIOLATIONS. The attorney general may investigate and prosecute all criminal
and civil violations of chapter 23, title 18, Idaho Code, and title 34, Idaho
Code.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.